Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-13.5] Housing choice voucher
program administration. Any housing choice voucher program voucher issued
by the authority shall automatically be returned to the authority upon the
death or removal from assistance of the last original household member;
provided that, where the original head or co-head of the household is survived
by a minor who was subsequently added to the household by birth, adoption, or
court order and the family properly reported the birth, adoption, or court
order to the authority, the household may retain the voucher until the youngest
minor added to the household reaches the age of twenty-one, or reaches the age
of twenty-three if the youngest minor is a full-time student at a business
school, technical school, college, community college, or university. No legal
guardian shall be added to the household to care for the minor or minors unless
the legal guardian is also eligible for participation in the housing choice
voucher program; provided further that any legal guardian added to the
household shall not retain the voucher after the youngest minor has reached the
age of twenty-one, or has reached the age of twenty-three if the youngest minor
is a full-time student at a business school, technical school, college,
community college, or university. [L 2014, c 178, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next